Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 9. Penalties.

Sec. 10.20.645.
Penalties imposed upon corporation.

A domestic or foreign corporation that fails or refuses to file its biennial report for any required reporting period within the time prescribed by this chapter is subject to a penalty of $5 to be assessed by the commissioner.

A domestic or foreign corporation that fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed by this chapter interrogatories propounded by the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 50 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 66 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.650.
Penalties imposed upon officers and directors.

Each officer and director of a domestic or foreign corporation who fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this chapter to answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded by the commissioner in accordance with this chapter, or who signs any articles, statement, report, application, or other document filed with the commissioner that is known to the officer or director to be false in any material respect, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)